Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 54
METROPOLITAN STATE UNIVERSITY
OF DENVER

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 19 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 2002, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing and reenacting this article, see section 1 of chapter 307, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

Section

23-54-101. University established - role and mission - governance.

There is hereby established a university at Denver, to be known as Metropolitan state university of Denver, which shall be a comprehensive institution with modified open admission standards at the baccalaureate level; except that nontraditional students at the baccalaureate level who are at least twenty years of age shall only have as an admission requirement a high school diploma, the successful completion of a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5), C.R.S., or the equivalent thereof. Metropolitan state university of Denver shall offer a variety of liberal arts and science, technical, and educational programs. The university may offer a limited number of professional programs. In furtherance of its role and mission, Metropolitan state university of Denver may offer master's degree programs that address the needs of its urban service area.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1276, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1295), ch. 233, p. 1069, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 422, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 383, § 15, effective April 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-54-101 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

23-54-102. Board of trustees - creation - members - powers - duties.

Effective July 1, 2002, there is established the board of trustees for Metropolitan state university of Denver, referred to in this article 54 as the "board of trustees", that consists of eleven members and is the governing authority for Metropolitan state university of Denver. The board of trustees created by this subsection (1) is a body corporate and, as such and by the names designated in this section, may:

Acquire, by purchase or lease, and hold property for the use of Metropolitan state university of Denver, develop and construct facilities upon the property, and dispose of the property, leasehold interests, and facilities; except that the board of trustees shall have the authority to dispose of a leasehold interest in property owned by the Auraria higher education center only to a constituent institution, as specified in section 23-70-101 (1)(b), or in connection with a sale and leaseback or other form of transaction in which Metropolitan state university of Denver will remain the ultimate user of the property;

Be a party to all suits and contracts;

Do all things necessary to carry out the provisions of this article in like manner as municipal corporations of this state, including but not limited to the power to demand, receive, hold, and use for the best interests of Metropolitan state university of Denver such money, lands, or other property as may be donated or devised to or for the university;

Without limiting the scope of any other authority, authorize, by resolution, revenue bonds and enter into other lawful financial transactions for the purpose of raising moneys for constructing or otherwise acquiring and equipping any facility or facilities necessary or useful to the accomplishment of the mission of Metropolitan state university of Denver; and

Transfer, assign, or pledge portions of its student fees, auxiliary revenues, capital facilities fees, and up to one hundred percent of tuition money to the Auraria higher education center to provide a source of repayment for revenue bonds or other loans or financial obligations incurred by the center to finance construction of an auxiliary facility, as defined in section 23-5-101.5 (2)(a); a complementary facility, as defined in section 23-70-105.5 (1); any other facility necessary or useful to the accomplishment of the mission of Metropolitan state university of Denver; or the infrastructure necessary to support any of the types of facilities specified in this subsection (1)(a)(V).

Nothing in this article shall authorize the board of trustees to enter into a contract for the construction of buildings or improvements that creates any debt or obligation upon the state. Buildings and improvements erected on lands controlled by the board of trustees and intended for the use of Metropolitan state university of Denver under the terms of this article and any leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxation as permitted by the state constitution.

The trustees and their successors shall have perpetual succession, shall have a seal, may make bylaws and regulations for the well-ordering and government of Metropolitan state university of Denver, and may conduct the business of the university in a manner not repugnant to the constitution and laws of this state. The board of trustees shall elect from the appointed members a chairperson, whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The board shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who are not members of the board and whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The staff of Metropolitan state university of Denver shall provide staff support for the board of trustees.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, nine members of the board of trustees. Members appointed by the governor shall serve terms of up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than five members' terms expire in the same year. All appointed members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Of the nine members appointed by the governor, no more than five members may be affiliated with the same political party.

A full-time junior or senior student at Metropolitan state university of Denver, elected by the student body at large, shall fill the tenth office as a member of the board of trustees. The term of office is one year, beginning on July 1 each year. The elected student office is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402. The elected student member of the board of trustees must have resided in the state of Colorado not fewer than three years immediately prior to election. As used in this subsection (3), "full-time student" has the same definition as "full-time equivalent student" used by the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

A full-time member of the teaching faculty at large of Metropolitan state university of Denver, elected by the faculty at large, shall fill the eleventh office as a member of the board of trustees. The term of office is one year, beginning on July 1 each year. The elected faculty member of the board of trustees is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402.

Any vacancy in the office of an appointed member of the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. Any vacancy in either of the elected offices on the board of trustees shall be filled by reelection for the unexpired term. Each trustee shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the powers, duties, and functions formerly performed by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado, as said governing board existed prior to July 1, 2003, with respect to Metropolitan state university of Denver are hereby transferred to the board of trustees. Policies, procedures, and agreements previously approved by the trustees of the state colleges, as the governing board existed prior to July 1, 2003, and applicable to Metropolitan state university of Denver shall remain in force and effect unless and until changed by the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1276, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 2595, § 4, effective July 1; (1)(b) and (6) amended, p. 790, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1233, § 7, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(a.5) added, p. 1077, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(1), (3), (4), and (6) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 422, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 695, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 40, § 50, effective February 25; IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(V) amended, (SB 22-121), ch. 76, p. 386, § 3, effective April 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-54-102 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsections (1), (3), (4), and (6), see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-54-102.5. Tuition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1844, § 16, effective June 9.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 424, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1844.)

23-54-103. Board of trustees for Metropolitan state university of Denver fund - creation - control - use.

Effective July 1, 2012, there is created in the state treasury the board of trustees for Metropolitan state university of Denver fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of this article. Except as otherwise allowed by state law, including but not limited to section 24-36-103 (2), C.R.S., all moneys received or acquired by the board of trustees or by Metropolitan state university of Denver shall be deposited in the fund, whether received by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift, or by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property, or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board of trustees and shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the fund shall remain under the control of the board of trustees and shall be used for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board of trustees and of Metropolitan state university of Denver and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board of trustees in carrying out its powers and duties.

Moneys in the fund which are not needed for use by the board of trustees may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be so invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of such amount.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1277, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 424, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2012, p. 424.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsections (1) and (2) and adding (4), see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

23-54-104. The Metropolitan state university of Denver undergraduate enrichment fund - created - awards.

Effective July 1, 2012, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the Metropolitan state college of Denver undergraduate enrichment fund as of July 1, 2012, shall be transferred to the Metropolitan state university of Denver undergraduate enrichment fund, which fund is hereby created in the department of higher education and is referred to in this section as the "enrichment fund". The enrichment fund shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees of Metropolitan state university of Denver. Any moneys credited to the enrichment fund shall remain in the enrichment fund and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year. Such moneys in the enrichment fund may be invested in the types of investments authorized in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. Any interest earned on the moneys in the enrichment fund is hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes stated in subsection (2) of this section.

Interest earned on moneys in the enrichment fund shall be used to fund programs to advance and enrich undergraduate education at Metropolitan state university of Denver. Awards for such purposes shall be granted by the board of trustees within one year after the date any moneys are credited to the fund and shall be annually granted thereafter. The board of trustees shall promulgate rules establishing the criteria to be used in granting such annual awards.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1278, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 792, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 425, § 6, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.